Washington statutes.
RCW 38.40.040

Interference with employment—Penalty.

A person, who either alone, or with another, wilfully deprives a member of the organized militia of Washington of his or her employment or prevents such member being employed, or obstructs or annoys said member or his or her employer in their trade, business or employment, because he or she is such member, or dissuades any person from enlisting in said organized militia by threat or injury to him or her in their employment, trade or business, in case he or she shall so enlist, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor and on conviction thereof shall be fined in a sum not exceeding five hundred dollars, or imprisonment in the county jail not more than six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

[ 1989 c 19 s 48; 1943 c 130 s 46; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-46. Prior: 1917 c 107 s 41; 1909 c 134 s 67; 1895 c 108 s 104, part.]